Alabama, session 2026rs, SB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) (1) The gross proceeds from the retail
sale of fish or other seafood which is in its original or
unmanufactured state by a producer are exempt from the state
sales and use tax as provided for in Section 40-23-2, Code of
Alabama 1975.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "producer" shall
mean an angler or a fisherman.
(b) The exemption provided in this section shall not
apply to county or municipal sales and use taxes unless
Page 1

apply to county or municipal sales and use taxes unless
SB123 INTRODUCED
approved by resolution or ordinance adopted by the local
governing body.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 2